Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 232.68, subsection 2, paragraph a, subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph division: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (d) If a child has a diagnosed behavioral health condition and, despite reasonable attempts, the childâs parent or legal guardian is unable to provide necessary care for the childâs health and welfare solely because the parent or legal guardian is unable to access appropriate behavioral or mental health treatment for the child, the department shall not consider the lack of provision of appropriate behavioral or mental health treatment as child abuse. This subparagraph division shall not be construed to prohibit the department from assessing a childâs situation and facilitating appropriate intervention the department deems is in the best interests of the child. Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ INCORPORATION INTO POLICIES. The department of health and human services shall adjust the departmentâs child abuse House File 2256, p. 2 assessment policies, including the departmentâs policy manuals, to incorporate the provisions of section 232.68, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (4), subparagraph division (d), as enacted in this Act. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2256, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor